District of Columbia statutes.
31-3302.09

Construction.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to:

(1)

Restrict the amount of the premium rates that an issuer may charge an individual for health insurance coverage provided in the individual market; or

(2)

Prevent a health insurer offering health insurance coverage in the individual market from establishing premium discounts or rebates or modifying otherwise applicable copayments or deductibles in return for adherence to programs of health promotion and disease prevention.

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-209, § 209, 45 DCR 8433
1981 Ed., § 35-1030.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-3301.01.
See notes to § 31-3301.01.